Illinois, session 104th, HB1808.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $1,400,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 6on June 30, 2024, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 7such purpose in Section 85 of Article 165 of Public Act 8103-0006, as amended, is reappropriated from the Build 9Illinois Bond Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity for a grant to the City of Calumet City for costs 11associated with capital improvements. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132025.